District of Columbia statutes.
48-801.01

List of most commonly used prescription drugs.

Thirty days prior to each issue date, the Department of Human Services shall furnish to the Office of Consumer Protection a list of the 100 most commonly used prescription drugs.

Sept. 10, 1976, D.C. Law 1-81, title I, § 101, 23 DCR 2460
Apr. 7, 1977, D.C. Law 1-114, § 3(a), 23 DCR 8743

History

1981 Ed., § 33-711.
1973 Ed., § 33-811.

Prior Codifications